Washington statutes.
RCW 18.34.110

Existing practitioner—Fee.

The secretary shall issue a license without examination to any person who makes application therefor within six months after June 12, 1957, pays a fee of fifty dollars and certifies under oath that he or she is of good moral character and has been actually and principally engaged in the practice of a dispensing optician in the state of Washington for a period of not less than six months immediately preceding June 12, 1957.

[ 1991 c 3 s 78; 1957 c 43 s 11.]